New Jersey, session 222, A1750.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: "Emergency medical response entity" means an organization, company, governmental entity, community-based program, or healthcare system that provides pre-hospital emergency medical services and assistance and is qualified to send paid or volunteer emergency medical responders to the scene of an emergency. "Emergency medical response entity" includes, but is not limited to, a first aid, rescue and ambulance squad or other basic life support ambulance provider; a mobile intensive care provider or other advanced life support ambulance provider; an air medical service provider; or a fire-fighting company or organization. "Law enforcement agency" means a department, division, bureau, commission, board, or other authority of the State or of any political subdivision thereof which employs law enforcement officers. "Opioid antidote" means any drug, regardless of dosage amount or method of administration, which has been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) for the treatment of an opioid overdose.  "Opioid antidote includes, but is not limited to, naloxone hydrochloride, in any dosage amount, which is administered through nasal spray or any other FDA-approved means or methods. "Recognized place of public access" means the same as that term is defined in section 3 of P.L.2013, c.46 (C.24:6J-3). "Sterile syringe access program" means a program established pursuant to the provisions of P.L.2006, c.99 (C.26:5C-25 et al.). 2.    a.  The Commissioner of Human Services shall establish, within the Department of Human Services, the Office of the Statewide Opioid Antidote Coordinator. b.    The commissioner shall appoint a Statewide Opioid Antidote Coordinator, who shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner, and who shall have experience in one or more of the following areas:  mental health and substance use disorders; law enforcement; health care; health policy; or procurement and processing. c.     The commissioner shall assign such administrative and clerical staff as shall be necessary to support the Statewide Opioid Antidote Coordinator in the performance of the coordinators duties. d.    At a minimum, the Statewide Opioid Antidote Coordinator shall be responsible for: (1)   overseeing the bulk purchasing and distribution of opioid antidotes on behalf of: (a)   all State, county, and local governmental agencies; (b)   upon request by an entity that distributes or administers opioid antidotes in the State, other than a pharmacy, overseeing the purchase of opioid antidotes on behalf of, and distributing opioid antidotes to, the entity, which entities may include, but shall not be limited to:  emergency medical response entities, law enforcement agencies, recognized places of public access, public and nonpublic schools, and sterile syringe access programs; (2)   working and liaising with the Department of Health, the Office of the Attorney General, the New Jersey State Police, the New Jersey Coordinator for Addiction Responses and Enforcement Strategies in the Office of the Attorney General, the Office of the Governor, and other governmental entities as may be necessary to support those entities in the performance of their duties as those duties relate to the purchase, distribution, and administration of opioid antidotes; and (3)   establishing and maintaining an Internet website that provides information to the public concerning opioid antidotes, including information concerning the nature of opioid antidotes, the administration of opioid antidotes, access to opioid antidotes, and responding to a suspected opioid overdose. e.     The Office of the Statewide Opioid Antidote Coordinator shall be supported by such federal funds as may be available for this purpose, as well as by an annual appropriation in an amount as may be needed to ensure the office is fully funded and supported. 3.    The Commissioner of Human Services shall prepare and submit an annual report to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature, describing the activities of the Statewide Opioid Antidote Coordinator over the prior year, including the total quantity of opioid antidotes purchased and distributed by the Statewide Opioid Antidote Coordinator, the types of entities to which opioid antidotes were distributed and the quantity of opioid antidotes distributed to each type of entity, estimated cost savings realized through the use of bulk purchasing of opioid antidotes, public information and outreach initiatives undertaken by the Statewide Opioid Antidote Coordinator, and any other information the commissioner determines to be necessary and appropriate. 4.    There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Human Services such sums as are necessary to establish and maintain the website required pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection d. of section 2 of this act. 5.    The Commissioner of Human Services may adopt rules and regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as are necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 6.    This act shall take effect the first day of the third month next following the date of enactment, except that the Commissioner of Human Services may take such anticipatory administrative action in advance as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act.